Illinois, session 104th, SB4165.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Article 43 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/Art. 43 heading new)7ARTICLE 438ENTITIES PARTICIPATING IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS 9    (30 ILCS 500/43-1 new)10    Sec. 43-1. Definition. As used in this Article, 11"immigration enforcement action" includes any arrests or 12detentions conducted by agents or officers of the United 13States Department of Homeland Security, the United States 14Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the United States Customs 15and Border Protection, or any other individual or entity with 16the power to arrest or detain individuals or manage custody of 17detained individuals for the purposes of civil immigration 18enforcement. 19    (30 ILCS 500/43-2 new)20    Sec. 43-2. Contract to Supply. Beginning on the effective 21date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, in   SB4165- 2 -LRB104 20967 TRT 34812 b1the case of a contract to supply a State agency with any 2product or service procured under this Code, the bidder or 3offeror shall certify, before the contract is awarded, 4renewed, amended, or extended, that the bidder or offeror does 5not sell products or provide services to the United States 6Department of Homeland Security, the United States Immigration 7and Customs Enforcement, or the United States Customs and 8Border Protection that are used in immigration enforcement 9actions. 10    (30 ILCS 500/43-3 new)11    Sec. 43-3. Prohibition. A State agency shall reject a bid 12from a bidder or offeror if the bidder or offeror certifies 13that the bidder or offeror sells products or provides services 14to the United States Department of Homeland Security, the 15United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or the 16United States Customs and Border Protection that are used in 17immigration enforcement actions. 18    (30 ILCS 500/43-4 new)19    Sec. 43-4. Waiver. A State agency shall not waive any of 20the requirements of this Article unless the Chief Procurement 21Officer has found that the purchase is exigent or an 22emergency. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.